test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-syenjir_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - syenjir: # 2B
    syenjir+N+Sg+Nom: syenjir
    syenjir+N+Sg+Gen: syennjir
    syenjir+N+Sg+Acc: syennjir
    syenjir+N+Sg+Ill: syenjirân
    syenjir+N+Sg+Loc: syenjirist
    syenjir+N+Sg+Com: syenjiráin
    syenjir+N+Sg+Abe: syennjirttáá
    syenjir+N+Ess:    syenjirin
    syenjir+N+Par:    syenjirid
    syenjir+N+Pl+Nom: syenjireh
    syenjir+N+Pl+Gen: syenjirij
    syenjir+N+Pl+Acc: syenjirijd
    syenjir+N+Pl+Ill: syenjiráid
    syenjir+N+Pl+Loc: syenjirijn
    syenjir+N+Pl+Com: syenjirijguin
    syenjir+N+Pl+Abe: syenjirijttáá
